Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1607
Industry, defined.

Industry means those persons involved in the production, transportation, and sale of propane and in the manufacture and distribution of propane utilization equipment.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 7.